District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
21 act may be cited as the “Housing Authority Resident Empowerment Temporary Amendment Act
22 of 2025”.
23 Sec. 1. The District of Columbia Housing Authority Act of 1999, effective May 9, 2000
24 (D.C. Law 13-105; D.C. Official Code § 6-201 et seq.), is amended as follows:
25 (a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 6-201) is amended as follows:
26 (1) Paragraph (6) is amended to read as follows:
27 “(6) “Board” means the Board of Commissioners established by section 4a;
28 provided, that for the purposes of sections 10(h), 12(r), and 21(b), the term “Board” shall include
29 any prior form in which the Board existed, since the establishment of the Authority pursuant to
1

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
30 this act.”.
31 (2) Paragraphs (8), (22), and (33) are repealed.
32 (3) Paragraph (10) is amended by striking the phrase “Resident Council Advisory
33 Board” and inserting the phrase “Resident Advisory Board” in its place.
34 (4) Paragraph (15) is amended by striking the phrase “District of Columbia
35 Housing Authority” and inserting the word “Authority” in its place.
36 (5) A new paragraph (17A) is added to read as follows:
37 “(17A) “Dwelling unit” means any room or group of rooms located within a
38 residential or mixed-use building and forming a single unit that is used or intended to be used for
39 living, sleeping, and the preparation and eating of meals.”.
40 (b) Section 3(b-1)(1)(A) (D.C. Official Code § 6-202(b-1)(1)(A)) is amended as follows:
41 (1) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “Beginning on
42 December 1, 2022, and monthly thereafter, the Authority shall submit a report” and inserting the
43 phrase “The Authority shall submit a quarterly report” in its place.
44 (2) Sub-subparagraph (iii) is amended by striking the phrase “units have been
45 vacant in the prior year,” and inserting the phrase “units have been vacant,” in its place.
46 (c) A new section 4a is added to read as follows:
47 “Sec. 4a. Board of Commissioners.
48 “(a) The Authority shall be governed by a Board of Commissioners (“Board”), which
49 shall consist of 9 members and govern in accordance with this section and section 12.
2

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
50 “(b) Residents of Housing Properties shall elect 2 Commissioners in accordance with
51 section 12(k). The Authority shall conduct elections for one such Commissioner to take office no
52 later than December 31, 2025, and every 3 years thereafter, and for the other elected
53 Commissioner to take office no later than December 31, 2026, and every 3 years thereafter.
54 “(c) The Mayor shall appoint 7 Commissioners with the advice and consent of the
55 Council, in accordance with section 2(e) of the Confirmation Act of 1978, effective March 3,
56 1979 (D.C. Law 2-142; D.C. Official Code § 1-523.01(e)), as follows:
57 “(1) No later than October 1, 2025, and every 3 years thereafter, the Mayor shall
58 nominate:
59 “(A) One member who has professional experience in federal housing
60 laws and regulations; and
61 “(B) One member who has professional experience in homeless services
62 system planning and coordinating.
63 “(2) No later than October 1, 2026, and every 3 years thereafter, the Mayor shall
64 nominate:
65 “(A) One member who has professional experience in affordable housing
66 development, operations, or finance; and
67 “(B) One member who has professional experience providing legal
68 assistance in housing matters to low-income District residents.
69 “(3) No later than October 1, 2027, and every 3 years thereafter, the Mayor shall
3

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
70 nominate:
71 “(A) One member who has experience as the holder of a housing voucher;
72 “(B) One member who has professional experience in capital project
73 financing; and
74 “(C) One member who has professional experience in accounting and
75 enterprise financial management.
76 “(d) No person shall be elected, appointed or reappointed to the Board if the person has
77 served 9 years or longer, either in consecutive or non-consecutive terms, as a member of the
78 Board of the Authority, in any form in which the Board existed, since the establishment of the
79 Authority pursuant to this act.”.
80 (d) Section 8a(a)(1) (D.C. Official Code § 6-207.01(a)(1)) is amended by striking the
81 word “February” and inserting the word “June” in its place.
82 (e) New sections 11a and 11b are added to read as follows:
83 “Sec. 11a. Transition from temporary Stabilization and Reform Board.
84 “(a) Each individual who serves as a voting or non-voting member of the temporary
85 Stabilization and Reform Board of the Authority as of the effective date of the Rebalancing
86 Expectations for Neighbors, Tenants, and Landlords (RENTAL) Act of 2025, as approved by the
87 Committee on Housing July 9, 2025 (Committee print of Bill 26-164), shall serve as a voting
88 interim Commissioner of the Board established by section 4a without need for confirmation or
89 appointment, until he or she is replaced or reappointed in accordance with this section. Section
4

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
90 12(d) shall not apply to individuals named in this section for purposes of the special initial terms
91 prescribed in this section.
92 “(b) No later than October 1, 2025, the Mayor shall nominate an interim Commissioner
93 with the qualifications identified in section 4a(c)(3)(C) for a 2-year term; provided, that
94 notwithstanding section 12(c)(2), the Mayor may nominate the Chief Financial Officer or their
95 Designee, who shall be an employee of the Chief Financial Officer, for such initial 2-year term;
96 provided, further that Leroy Clay III shall serve as an interim Commissioner until reconfirmed
97 or replaced in this manner. The 2-year term of the Commissioner appointed pursuant to this
98 subsection shall expire when the first Commissioner identified in section 4a(c)(3)(C) is
99 appointed.
100 “(c) The President of the City-Wide Resident Advisory Board shall serve as an interim
101 Commissioner until the first Commissioner described under section 4a(b) is elected and takes
102 office.
103 “(d) No later than October 1, 2025, the Mayor shall nominate 2 interim Commissioners
104 with the qualifications listed in section 4a(c)(2)(A) for one-year terms; provided, that Raymond
105 A. Skinner and James M. Dickerson shall serve as Commissioners until they are reappointed or
106 replaced in this manner; provided, further that Raymond A. Skinner shall be Chairperson of the
107 Board until the Board selects a Chairperson pursuant to section 12(m). The 2 Commissioners
108 appointed pursuant to this subsection shall serve as Commissioners until the second
109 Commissioner identified under section 4a(b) is elected and takes office and the first
5

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
110 Commissioner appointed pursuant to section 4a(c)(2)(A) takes office.
111 “(e) Christopher Murphy shall serve as an interim Commissioner until he is reappointed
112 as or replaced by the first Commissioner appointed pursuant to section 4a(c)(1)(A).
113 “(f) No later than October 1, 2025, the Mayor shall nominate one interim Commissioner
114 with the qualifications listed in section 4a(c)(3)(B) for a 2-year term.
115 “(g) No later than October 1, 2025, the Mayor shall nominate one interim Commissioner
116 with the qualifications listed in section 4a(c)(3)[(]A) for a 2-year term; provided, that Denise
117 Blackson shall serve as a Commissioner until she is reappointed to such 2-year term or replaced
118 by the appointee to such 2-year term.
119 “(h) No later than October 1, 2025, the Mayor shall nominate one interim Commissioner
120 who has attained homeownership with the assistance of the Authority for a one-year term;
121 provided, that Ronnie Harris shall serve as an interim Commissioner until she is reappointed as
122 or replaced by such homeownership experience Commissioner pursuant to this subsection. .
123 “(i) Notwithstanding section 12(c)(2), the Mayor may nominate the Executive Director of
124 the Interagency Council on Homelessness for the initial 3-year term specified in section
125 4a(c)(1)(B). Theresa Silla shall serve as an interim Commissioner until reappointed or replaced
126 in this manner.
127 “(j) Jennifer Reed shall serve as a Commissioner until a quorum of Commissioners
128 confirmed, reconfirmed, or elected pursuant to this section and section 4a take office.
129 “(k) Notwithstanding section 1108(c-2)(1) of the District of Columbia Government
6

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
130 Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-139; D.C.
131 Official Code § 1-611.08(c-2)(1)):
132 “(1) Commissioners who are District government employees shall not be entitled
133 to stipends for their service on the Board.
134 “(2) Prior to January 1, 2026, stipends for Board service shall be limited to $4,000
135 per year and an additional stipend of $2,000 per year for the Chairperson.
136 “(l) This section shall sunset upon all Commissioners of the Board established pursuant
137 to section 4a taking office.
138 “Sec. 11b. City-Wide Resident Advisory Board training and consultation.
139 “(a) The Authority shall establish and implement a comprehensive training program for
140 members of the City-Wide Resident Advisory Board with the goal of enabling tenant members to
141 participate fully in the oversight of the Authority’s operation and capital planning. The Authority
142 shall develop the training program in consultation with public housing residents and public
143 housing industry professional organizations.
144 “(b) The Authority shall provide to the City-Wide Resident Advisory Board training on
145 relevant federal and District laws, leadership development, communication, and negotiations.
146 “(c) The Authority shall provide a copy of resolutions on the agenda for consideration by
147 the Board to the City-Wide Resident Advisory Board at least 24 hours before the scheduled date
148 and time of the Board meeting at which the resolution will be considered.
149 “(d) The Authority shall seek and consider the input of the City-Wide Resident Advisory
7

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
150 Board when a policy or program change affects residents.
151 “(e) At least once a quarter, the Board shall invite the City-Wide Resident Advisory
152 Board to report to the Board on any topics of interest or concerns, and respond to the concerns of
153 the City-Wide Resident Advisory Board in writing, no later than 45 days following the quarterly
154 meeting.”.
155 (f) Section 12 (D.C. Official Code § 6-211) is amended as follows:
156 (1) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
157 “Sec. 12. Additional Board provisions.”.
158 (2) Subsections (a), (e), (f), (g), (j), (o), and (p) are repealed.
159 (3) Subsections (b) and (c) are amended to read as follows:
160 “(b)(1) At least 60 days prior to submitting any nominating resolution to the Council after
161 December 31, 2025, the Mayor shall publish a notice in the Register that states which of the
162 Board positions in section 4a the Mayor is working to fill and that invites members of the public
163 to identify and submit to the Mayor potential nominees for the Mayor to consider; provided, that
164 the Mayor shall not be required to select a nominee from among the list of individuals identified
165 by the public. The notice shall provide instructions as to how members of the public can submit
166 to the Mayor the name, contact information, relevant experience, and such other relevant details
167 as the Mayor deems necessary of a potential nominee.
168 “(2) The Mayor shall submit a list of potential nominees submitted in response to
169 the Mayor’s solicitation described in paragraph (1) of this subsection as an attachment to each
8

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
170 nomination resolution submitted to the Council.
171 “(c)(1) An individual seeking to serve as a Commissioner identified under section
172 4a(c)(1), (2), and (3)(B) and (C) shall have 5 or more years of professional experience in a
173 relevant leadership role out of the last 10 years.
174 “(2) No officer or employee of the federal or District government may serve as a
175 Commissioner.”.
176 (4) Subsection (h) is amended as follows:
177 (A) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
178 “(1) Within 90 days after each Commissioner’s appointment or election, the
179 Commissioner shall complete training covering the following topics:
180 “(A) The role of a public housing agency board;
181 “(B) Ethics for public housing agencies and board members or
182 commissioners;
183 “(C) Background on major housing authority programs, including but not
184 limited to public housing, the Housing Choice Voucher Program, and the rental assistance
185 demonstration;
186 “(D) Fair housing and reasonable accommodations;
187 “(E) Public housing authority budgets, financial oversight, and financial
188 reporting; and
189 “(F) Federal procurement requirements.”.
9

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
190 (B) Paragraph (2) is repealed.
191 (C) Paragraph (3) is amended to read as follows:
192 “(3) In addition to the training required in paragraph (1) of this subsection, each
193 Commissioner shall spend at least 4 hours per quarter in training or educational seminars on
194 corporate governance, public housing and Housing Choice Voucher Program law and
195 regulations, the Moving to Work program, resident opportunity such as HUD’s Section 3
196 requirements for economic and employment opportunities, HUD reporting requirements, public
197 housing performance monitoring and risk management, federal or local language access
198 guidelines, labor and personnel, real estate and construction, or other subjects related to housing
199 authority operation, and management. The maximum reimbursable cost, if any, of this training
200 shall be established by the Board and paid by the Authority.”.
201 (D) Paragraph (6) is repealed.
202 (5) Subsection (i) is amended to read as follows:
203 “(i) The elected Commissioners shall be public housing residents at the time of election;
204 provided, that an elected Commissioner who ceases to reside in public housing may complete
205 their term unless removed pursuant to subsection (t) of this section.”.
206 (6) Subsection (k) is amended as follows:
207 (A) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
208 “(1) Elections of Commissioners by Housing Property residents shall be
209 conducted in accordance with rules and procedures established by the Board, and shall be held
10

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
210 no sooner than 5 months and no later than 2 months prior to the expiration of the then current 3-
211 year term. All elections shall be held under the supervision of an independent expert in election
212 monitoring, to be selected by the Board.”.
213 (B) Paragraph (2) is amended as follows:
214 (i) The lead-in language is amended to read as follows:
215 “(2) The results of each election shall be retained until the elected Commissioner
216 begins their term pursuant to the next scheduled election. If the elected Commissioner becomes
217 unable to serve or is removed from the Board as hereinafter provided, that Commissioner’s seat
218 for the remaining term shall be filled as follows:”.
219 (ii) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the phrase “City-
220 Wide Resident Council Advisory Board;” and inserting the phrase “City-Wide Resident
221 Advisory Board;” in its place.
222 (7) Subsection (m) is amended by striking the sentences “The Mayor shall
223 designate one of his or her 4 nominees nominated pursuant to subsection (a)(1) of this section as
224 Chairperson. The ex officio Commissioner shall not be appointed as Chairperson.” and inserting
225 the sentence “The Board shall elect a Chairperson from among its members.” in its place.
226 (8) Subsection (q) is amended by striking the phrase “Other than the ex officio
227 Commissioner and the labor representative who is a Commissioner, no person” and inserting the
228 phrase “No person” in its place.
229 (9) Subsection (u) is amended to read as follows:
11

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
230 “(u) The Board may, by majority vote, require that any Commissioner or Executive
231 Director resolve actual or potential conflicts of interest by reporting the actual or potential
232 conflict of interest to the general counsel and ethics officer of the Authority for consideration and
233 determination of required steps, which may include public disclosure of the conflict of interest
234 and recusal from the decision-making process involving the conflict, divestiture, or any other
235 manner which complies with federal and District law.”.
236 (10) Subsection (w) is amended to read as follows:
237 “(w) The Board shall meet regularly at least 10 times each calendar year. Each meeting
238 shall provide for a period for public comments, which shall not be limited in time, except that the
239 time allowed each individual speaker may be reasonably limited. To allow the Board to meet and
240 entertain any proposed action, there must be a quorum present, which shall consist of 5
241 Commissioners. Meetings of the Board shall be subject to the Open Meetings Act, effective
242 March 31, 2011 (D.C. Law 18-350; D.C. Official Code § 2-571 et seq.).”.
243 (g) Section 14 (D.C. Official Code § 6-213) is amended as follows:
244 (1) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the phrase “direction and supervision”
245 and inserting the word “oversight” in its place.
246 (2) The lead-in language of subsection (d)(1) is amended to read as follows:
247 “(d)(1) Within 90 days of the Executive Director’s appointment, to the extent
248 directed by the Board, the Executive Director shall complete training covering the following
249 topics:”.
12

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
250 (3) A new subsection (e) is added to read as follows:
251 “(e) As part of the process of selecting an Executive Director, the Board shall seek and
252 consider the input of public housing residents, voucher holders, and the City-Wide Resident
253 Advisory Board.”.
254 (h) Section 26g(b)(2) (D.C. Official Code § 6-232(b)(2)) is amended as follows:
255 (1) Subparagraph (E) is amended to read as follows:
256 “(E) To file a complaint that requests an administrative determination of
257 the resident’s rights when the resident believes that the resident has been aggrieved or adversely
258 affected by an act or a failure to act by an Authority official, as provided in Authority policy and
259 regulations;”.
260 (2) Subparagraphs (G), (H), and (I) are amended to read as follows:
261 “(G) To have a lease terminated only for serious or repeated violations of
262 the material terms of the lease, as provided in the relevant provisions of the Authority’s public
263 housing regulations, which shall be identified in the Bill of Rights;
264 “(H) To 30 days’ notice of any action to correct, cure, or vacate for
265 violation of a lease, except where the Authority has determined that the head of household
266 responsible for the dwelling unit under the lease is deceased and there are no remaining
267 household members, as provided in the relevant provisions of the Authority’s public housing
268 regulations, which shall be identified in the Bill of Rights;
269 “(I) To be relocated away from living conditions that represent an
13

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
270 emergency or a threat to life, health, or safety as determined by the Authority, another
271 governmental entity, or as a result of a judicial proceeding; to alleviate threat of attack by
272 criminal elements as verified and documented by the Authority Police Department or any other
273 police department or law enforcement agency authorized to operate in the District; and in certain
274 other circumstances, as provided in the relevant provisions of the Authority’s public housing
275 regulations, which shall be identified in the Bill of Rights;”.
276 Sec. 3. Section 1108(c-2)(1) of the District of Columbia Government Comprehensive
277 Merit Personnel Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-139; D.C. Official Code § 1-
278 611.08(c-2)(1)), is amended to read as follows:
279 “(1) Each Commissioner of the Board of the District of Columbia Housing
280 Authority (“Board”) shall be entitled to a stipend of $8,000 per year for their service, and the
281 chairperson shall be entitled to an additional stipend of $4,000 per year; provided, that subsection
282 (c-3) of this section shall not apply to the chairperson of such Board. Each such Commissioner
283 also shall be entitled to reimbursement of actual travel and other expenses reasonably related to
284 attendance at Board meetings and fulfillment of official duties. Stipends and reimbursements
285 shall be made at least quarterly and prorated, if necessary, to reflect the dates of actual
286 membership on the Board or dates of service as chairperson of the Board;”.
287 Sec. 4. Section 2(e)(27) of the Confirmation Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C.
288 Law 2-142; D.C. Official Code § 1-523.01(e)(27)), is amended to read as follows:
289 “(27) The Board of the District of Columbia Housing Authority, as established by
14

ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
290 section 4a of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Act of 1999, passed on emergency
291 basis on July 28, 2025 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-333);”.
292 Sec. 5. Repealers.
293 (a) The District of Columbia Housing Authority Stabilization and Reform Emergency
294 Amendment Act of 2025, effective June 25, 2025 (D.C. Act 26-89; 72 DCR 7544), is repealed.
295 (b) The District of Columbia Housing Authority Stabilization and Reform Temporary
296 Amendment Act of 2025, enacted on July 7, 2025 (D.C. Act 26-100; 72 DCR 7676), is repealed.
297 Sec. 6. Fiscal impact statement.
298 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
299 statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
300 October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
301 Sec. 7. Effective date.
302 (a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
303 the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review
304 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
305 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
306 Columbia Register.
307 (b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
15